California statutes. Civil Code
The maxims of jurisprudence hereinafter set forth are intended not to qualify any of the foregoing provisions of this code, but to aid in their just application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 20.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3510.

When the reason of a rule ceases, so should the rule itself.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3511.

Where the reason is the same, the rule should be the same.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3512.

One shall not change their purpose to the injury of another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3513.

Any one may waive the advantage of a law intended solely for their benefit. But a law established for a public reason cannot be contravened by a private agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 2.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3514.

One must so use his own rights as not to infringe upon the rights of another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3515.

A person who consents to an act is not wronged by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 3.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3516.

Acquiescence in error takes away the right of objecting to it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3517.

No one can take advantage of their own wrong.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 4.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3518.

A person who has fraudulently dispossessed themselves of a thing may be treated as if they still had possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 5.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3519.

A person who can and does not forbid that which is done on their behalf, is deemed to have bidden it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 6.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3520.

No one should suffer by the act of another.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3521.

A person who takes the benefit must bear the burden.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 7.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3522.

One who grants a thing is presumed to grant also whatever is essential to its use.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3523.

For every wrong there is a remedy.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3524.

Between those who are equally in the right, or equally in the wrong, the law does not interpose.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3525.

Between rights otherwise equal, the earliest is preferred.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3526.

No person is responsible for that which no person can control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 8.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3527.

The law helps the vigilant, before those who sleep on their rights.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3528.

The law respects form less than substance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3529.

That which ought to have been done is to be regarded as done, in favor of a person to whom, and against a person from whom, performance is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 9.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3530.

That which does not appear to exist is to be regarded as if it did not exist.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3531.

The law never requires impossibilities.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3532.

The law neither does nor requires idle acts.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3533.

The law disregards trifles.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3534.

Particular expressions qualify those which are general.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3535.

Contemporaneous exposition is in general the best.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3536.

The greater contains the less.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3537.

Superfluity does not vitiate.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3538.

That is certain which can be made certain.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3539.

Time does not confirm a void act.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3540.

The incident follows the principal, and not the principal the incident.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3541.

An interpretation which gives effect is preferred to one which makes void.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3542.

Interpretation must be reasonable.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3543.

Where one of two innocent persons must suffer by the act of a third, the person, by whose negligence it happened, must be the sufferer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 812, Sec. 10.   (AB 1899)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3545.

Private transactions are fair and regular.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

3546.

Things happen according to the ordinary course of nature and the ordinary habits of life.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

3547.

A thing continues to exist as long as is usual with things of that nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

3548.

The law has been obeyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. Common Interest Developments [4000. - 6150.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4000. - 4190.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Provisions [4000. - 4070.]

4000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act. In a provision of this part, the part may be referred to as the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

Division, part, title, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 183, Sec. 7.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

Nothing in the act that added this part shall be construed to invalidate a document prepared or action taken before January 1, 2014, if the document or action was proper under the law governing common interest developments at the time that the document was prepared or the action was taken. For the purposes of this section, “document” does not include a governing document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4020.

Unless a contrary intent is clearly expressed, a local zoning ordinance is construed to treat like structures, lots, parcels, areas, or spaces in like manner regardless of the form of the common interest development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4035.

(a) If a provision of this act requires that a document be delivered to an association, the document shall be delivered to the person designated in the annual policy statement, prepared pursuant to Section 5310, to receive documents on behalf of the association. If no person has been designated to receive documents, the document shall be delivered to the president or secretary of the association.

(b) A document delivered pursuant to this section may be delivered by any of the following methods:

(1) By email, facsimile, or other electronic means, if the association has assented to that method of delivery.

(2) By personal delivery, if the association has assented to that method of delivery. If the association accepts a document by personal delivery it shall provide a written receipt acknowledging delivery of the document.

(3) By first-class mail, postage prepaid, registered or certified mail, express mail, or overnight delivery by an express service center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 183, Sec. 8.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4040.

(a) (1) If a provision of this act requires an association to deliver a document by “individual delivery” or “individual notice,” the association shall deliver that document in accordance with the preferred delivery method specified by the member pursuant to Section 4041.

(2) If the member has not provided a valid delivery method pursuant to Section 4041, the association shall deliver the document by first-class mail, registered or certified mail, express mail, or overnight delivery by an express service carrier addressed to the recipient at the address last shown on the books of the association.

(b) Upon receipt of a request by a member identifying a secondary email or mailing address for delivery of notices, pursuant to Section 5260, the association shall deliver an additional copy of both of the following to the secondary address identified in that request:

(1) The documents to be delivered to the member pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 6.

(2) The documents to be delivered to the member pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5650) of Chapter 8 and Section 5710.

(c) For the purposes of this section, an unrecorded provision of the governing documents providing for a particular method of delivery does not constitute agreement by a member to that method of
 delivery.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 640, Sec. 2.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4041.

(a) A member shall, on an annual basis, provide written notice to the association of all of the following:

(1) The member’s preferred delivery method for receiving notices from the association, which shall include the option of receiving notices at one or both of the following:

(A) A mailing address.

(B) A valid email address.

(2) An alternate or secondary delivery method for receiving notices from the association, which shall include the option to receive notices at one or both of the following:

(A) A mailing
 address.

(B) A valid email address.

(3) The name, mailing address, and, if available, valid email address of the owner’s legal representative, if any, including any person with power of attorney or other person who can be contacted in the event of the member’s extended absence from the separate interest.

(4) Whether the separate interest is owner-occupied, is rented out, if the parcel is developed but vacant, or if the parcel is undeveloped land.

(b) (1) The association shall solicit the annual notices described in subdivision (a) of each owner and, at least 30 days before making its own required disclosure under Sections 5300 and 5310, shall enter the data into its books and records.

(2) The association shall include in the solicitation required by paragraph (1) both of the following:

(A) Notification that the member does not have to provide an email address to the association.

(B) A simple method for the member to inform the association in writing that the member wishes to change their preferred delivery method for receiving notices from the association.

(c) If a member fails to provide the notices set forth in subdivision (a), the last mailing address provided in writing by the member or, if none, the property address shall be deemed to be the address to which notices are to be delivered.

(d) (1) To the extent that interests regulated in Chapter 2
 (commencing with Section 11210) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code are part of a mixed-use project where those interests comprise a portion of a common interest development, the association, as defined in Section 4080, shall be deemed compliant with this section if, at least once annually, it obtains from the time-share plan association a copy of the list described in subdivision (e) of Section 11273 of the Business and Professions Code, and enters the data into its books and records.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11273 of the Business and Professions Code, the time-share plan association shall provide the list required by paragraph (1) to the association at least annually for this purpose.

(e) For the purposes of this section, a valid email address is one that, after a notice is sent, does not result in a bounce or other error
 notification indicating failure of the message. If the association delivers a notice to a member’s email address and finds that the email address provided is no longer valid, the association shall resend the notice to a mailing or email address identified by the member pursuant to Section 4040.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   (SB 1252)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4045.

(a) If a provision of this act requires “general delivery” or “general notice,” the document shall be provided by one or more of the following methods:

(1) Any method provided for delivery of an individual notice pursuant to Section 4040.

(2) Inclusion in a billing statement, newsletter, or other document that is delivered by one of the methods provided in this section.

(3) Posting the printed document in a prominent location that is accessible to all members, if the location has been designated for the posting of general notices by the association in the
 annual policy statement prepared pursuant to Section 5310.

(4) If the association broadcasts television programming for the purpose of distributing information on association business to its members, by inclusion in the programming.

(5) If the association maintains an internet website for the purpose of distributing information on association business to its members, by posting the notice on the association’s internet website in a prominent location that is accessible to all members if designated as a location for posting general notices in the annual policy statement prepared pursuant to Section 5310.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a member requests to receive general notices by individual delivery, all general notices to
 that member, given under this section, shall be delivered pursuant to Section 4040. The option provided in this subdivision shall be described in the annual policy statement prepared pursuant to Section 5310.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 640, Sec. 4.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4050.

(a) This section governs the delivery of a document pursuant to this act.

(b) If a document is delivered by mail, delivery is deemed to be complete on deposit into the United States mail.

(c) If a document is delivered by electronic means, delivery is complete at the time of transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4055.

If the association or a member receives information by electronic delivery pursuant to Section 4040, and a provision of this act requires that the information be in writing, that requirement is satisfied if the information is provided in an electronic record capable of retention by the recipient at the time of receipt. An electronic record is not capable of retention by the recipient if the sender or its information processing system inhibits the ability of the recipient to print or store the electronic record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 640, Sec. 5.   (SB 392)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4065.

If a provision of this act requires that an action be approved by a majority of all members, the action shall be approved or ratified by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4070.

If a provision of this act requires that an action be approved by a majority of a quorum of the members, the action shall be approved or ratified by an affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting in a duly held election in which a quorum is represented, which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 183, Sec. 9.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [4075. - 4190.]

4075.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4076.

“Annual budget report” means the report described in Section 5300.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4078.

“Annual policy statement” means the statement described in Section 5310.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4080.

“Association” means a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association created for the purpose of managing a common interest development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4085.

“Board” means the board of directors of the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4090.

“Board meeting” means either of the following:

(a) A congregation, at the same time and place, of a sufficient number of directors to establish a quorum of the board, to hear, discuss, or deliberate upon any item of business that is within the authority of the board.

(b) A teleconference, where a sufficient number of directors to establish a quorum of the board, in different locations, are connected by electronic means, through audio or video, or both. A teleconference meeting shall be conducted in a manner that protects the rights of members of the association and otherwise complies with the requirements of this act. Except for a meeting that
 will be held solely in executive session or conducted under Section 4926 or 5450, the notice of the teleconference meeting shall identify at least one physical location so that members of the association may attend, and at least one director or a person designated by the board shall be present at that location. Participation by directors in a teleconference meeting constitutes presence at that meeting as long as all directors participating are able to hear one another, as well as members of the association speaking on matters before the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4095.

(a) “Common area” means the entire common interest development except the separate interests therein. The estate in the common area may be a fee, a life estate, an estate for years, or any combination of the foregoing.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in a planned development described in subdivision (b) of Section 4175, the common area may consist of mutual or reciprocal easement rights
appurtenant to the separate interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4100.

“Common interest development” means any of the following:

(a) A community apartment project.

(b) A condominium project.

(c) A planned development.

(d) A stock cooperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

“Community apartment project” means a development in which an undivided interest in land is coupled with the right of exclusive occupancy of any apartment located thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.

(a) “Community service organization or similar entity” means a nonprofit entity, other than an association, that is organized to provide services to residents of the common interest development or to the public in addition to the residents, to the extent community common area or facilities are available to the public.

(b) “Community service organization or similar entity” does not include an entity
that has been organized solely to raise moneys and contribute to other nonprofit organizations that are qualified as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that provide housing or housing assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4120.

“Condominium plan” means a plan described in Section 4285.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4125.

(a) A “condominium project” means a real property development consisting of condominiums.

(b) A condominium consists of an undivided interest in common in a portion of real property coupled with a separate interest in space called a unit, the boundaries of which are described on a recorded final map, parcel map, or condominium plan in sufficient detail to locate all boundaries thereof. The area
within these boundaries may be filled with air, earth, water, or fixtures, or any combination thereof, and need not be physically attached to land except by easements for access and, if necessary, support. The description of the unit may refer to (1) boundaries described in the recorded final map, parcel map, or condominium plan, (2) physical boundaries, either in existence, or to be constructed, such as walls, floors, and ceilings of a structure or any portion thereof, (3) an entire structure containing one or more units, or (4) any combination thereof.

(c) The portion or portions of the real property held in undivided interest may be all of the real property, except for the separate interests, or may include a particular three-dimensional portion thereof, the boundaries of which are described on a recorded final map, parcel map, or condominium plan. The area within these boundaries may be filled with air, earth, water, or fixtures, or any
combination thereof, and need not be physically attached to land except by easements for access and, if necessary, support.

(d) An individual condominium within a condominium project may include, in addition, a separate interest in other portions of the real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4130.

“Declarant” means the person or group of persons designated in the declaration as declarant, or if no declarant is designated, the person or group of persons who sign the original declaration or who succeed to special rights, preferences, or privileges designated in the declaration as belonging to the signator of the original declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4135.

“Declaration” means the document, however denominated, that contains the information required by Sections 4250 and 4255.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4140.

“Director” means a natural person who serves on the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4145.

(a) “Exclusive use common area” means a portion of the common area designated by the declaration for the exclusive use of one or more, but fewer than all, of the owners of the separate interests and which is or will be appurtenant to the separate interest or interests.

(b) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, patios,
exterior doors, doorframes, and hardware incident thereto, screens and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single separate interest, but located outside the boundaries of the separate interest, are exclusive use common area allocated exclusively to that separate interest.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of the declaration, internal and external telephone wiring designed to serve a single separate interest, but located outside the boundaries of the separate interest, is exclusive use common area allocated exclusively to that separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4148.

“General notice” means the delivery of a document pursuant to Section 4045.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4150.

“Governing documents” means the declaration and any other documents, such as bylaws, operating rules, articles of incorporation, or articles of association, which govern the operation of the common interest development or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

“Individual notice” means the delivery of a document pursuant to Section 4040.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4155.

“Item of business” means any action within the authority of the board, except those actions that the board has validly delegated to any other person or persons, managing agent, officer of the association, or committee of the board comprising less than a quorum of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4158.

(a) A “managing agent” is a person who, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, exercises control over the assets of a common interest development.

(b) A “managing agent” does not include any of the following:

(1) A regulated financial institution operating within the normal course of its regulated business practice.

(2) An attorney at law acting within the scope of the attorney’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4160.

“Member” means an owner of a separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4170.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, or other entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4175.

“Planned development” means a real property development other than a community apartment project, a condominium project, or a stock cooperative, having either or both of the following features:

(a) Common area that is owned either by an association or in common by the owners of the separate interests who possess appurtenant rights to the beneficial use and enjoyment of the common area.

(b) Common area and an association that maintains the common area with the power to levy assessments that may become a lien upon the separate interests in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 5650) of Chapter 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4177.

“Reserve accounts” means both of the following:

(a) Moneys that the board has identified for use to defray the future repair or replacement of, or additions to, those major components that the association is obligated to maintain.

(b) The funds received, and not yet expended or disposed of, from either a compensatory damage award or settlement to an
association from any person for injuries to property, real or personal, arising from any construction or design defects. These funds shall be separately itemized from funds described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4178.

“Reserve account requirements” means the estimated funds that the board has determined are required to be available at a specified point in time to repair, replace, or restore those major components that the association is obligated to maintain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4185.

(a) “Separate interest” has the following meanings:

(1) In a community apartment project, “separate interest” means the exclusive right to occupy an apartment, as specified in Section 4105.

(2) In a condominium project, “separate interest” means a separately owned unit, as specified in Section 4125.

(3) In a planned development, “separate interest” means a separately owned lot, parcel, area, or space.

(4) In a stock cooperative, “separate interest” means the exclusive right to occupy a portion of the real property, as specified in Section 4190.

(b) Unless the declaration or condominium plan, if any exists, otherwise provides, if walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a separate interest, the interior surfaces of the perimeter walls, floors, ceilings, windows, doors, and outlets located within the separate interest are part of the separate interest and any other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are part of the common area.

(c) The estate in a separate interest may be a fee, a life estate, an estate for years, or any
combination of the foregoing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4190.

(a) “Stock cooperative” means a development in which a corporation is formed or availed of, primarily for the purpose of holding title to, either in fee simple or for a term of years, improved real property, and all or substantially all of the shareholders of the corporation receive a right of exclusive occupancy in a portion of the real property, title to which is held by the corporation. The owners’ interest in the corporation, whether evidenced by a share of
stock, a certificate of membership, or otherwise, shall be deemed to be an interest in a common interest development and a real estate development for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section 25100 of the Corporations Code.

(b) A “stock cooperative” includes a limited equity housing cooperative which is a stock cooperative that meets the criteria of Section 817.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Application of Act [4200. - 4202.]

4200.

This act applies and a common interest development is created whenever a separate interest coupled with an interest in the common area or membership in the association is, or has been, conveyed, provided all of the following are recorded:

(a) A declaration.

(b) A condominium plan, if any exists.

(c) A final map or parcel map, if Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code requires the recording of either a final map or parcel map for the common interest development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

Nothing in this act may be construed to apply to a real property development that does not contain common area. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

This part does not apply to a commercial or industrial common interest development, as defined in Section 6531.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 19.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Governing Documents [4205. - 4370.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4205. - 4235.]

4205.

(a) To the extent of any conflict between the governing documents and the law, the law shall prevail.

(b) To the extent of any conflict between the articles of incorporation and the declaration, the declaration shall prevail.

(c) To the extent of any conflict between the
bylaws and the articles of incorporation or declaration, the articles of incorporation or declaration shall prevail.

(d) To the extent of any conflict between the operating rules and the bylaws, articles of incorporation, or declaration, the bylaws, articles of incorporation, or declaration shall prevail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 183, Sec. 11.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4210.

In order to facilitate the collection of regular assessments, special assessments, transfer fees as authorized by Sections 4530, 4575, and 4580, and similar charges, the board is authorized to record a statement or amended statement identifying relevant information for the association. This statement may include any or all of the following information:

(a) The name of the association as shown in the declaration or the
current name of the association, if different.

(b) The name and address of a managing agent or treasurer of the association or other individual or entity authorized to receive assessments and fees imposed by the association.

(c) A daytime telephone number of the authorized party identified in subdivision (b) if a telephone number is available.

(d) A list of separate interests subject to assessment by the association, showing the assessor’s parcel number or legal description, or both, of the separate interests.

(e) The recording information identifying the declaration governing the association.

(f) If an amended statement is being recorded, the recording information identifying the prior
statement or statements which the amendment is superseding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4215.

Any deed, declaration, or condominium plan for a common interest development shall be liberally construed to facilitate the operation of the common interest development, and its provisions shall be presumed to be independent and severable. Nothing in Article 3 (commencing with Section 715) of Chapter 2 of Title 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 shall operate to invalidate any provisions of the governing documents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4220.

In interpreting deeds and condominium plans, the existing physical boundaries of a unit in a condominium project, when the boundaries of the unit are contained within a building, or of a unit reconstructed in substantial accordance with the original plans thereof, shall be conclusively presumed to be its boundaries rather than the metes and bounds expressed in the deed or condominium plan, if any exists, regardless of settling or lateral movement of the building and regardless of minor
variance between boundaries shown on the plan or in the deed and those of the building.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4225.

(a) No declaration or other governing document shall include a restrictive covenant in violation of Section 12955 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or provision of the governing documents, the board, without approval of the members, shall amend any declaration or other governing document that includes a restrictive covenant prohibited by this section to delete the restrictive covenant, and shall restate the declaration or other governing document without the restrictive covenant but with no other change to the declaration or governing document.

(c) If the declaration is amended under this section, the board shall record the restated declaration in each county in